Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-630
Water storage or service; contract required; conditions.

No person, irrigation district or irrigation company shall be liable for the payment of any rent or charge for water storage or service unless a contract therefor has been entered into between such person, irrigation district or irrigation company, and the power and irrigation district furnishing such water storage or such water service. No contract for water service shall be made or continued if the rates, tolls, rents, or charges for such service do not provide the person, irrigation district or irrigation company, or the power and irrigation district with the benefits of an overall profitable and successful operation as provided for in section 70-655, and each contract shall contain such a provision; Provided, that if such a provision shall be omitted from any contract, the contract shall be subject to the provisions of this section regardless of the price or prices stated in such contract.

Laws 1933, c. 86, § 8, p. 350;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-708;

R.S.1943, § 70-630;

Laws 1974, LB 822, § 1.